Hawaii statutes.
§54-54 General management. The
board of water supply shall, with the advice and consent of the council of the
county, appoint a manager who shall have qualifications that the board deems
necessary, and who shall have full power to administer the affairs of the
waterworks and the water systems that are by this part placed under the control
of the board. The manager shall be known as the manager of the board of water
supply of the county of Hawaii, shall serve at the pleasure of the board, and
shall be subject to the direction of the board.

The manager shall be subject to chapter 77.

The manager shall appoint subordinates,
assistants, and employees that may be necessary for the proper conduct of the
business of the board and the subordinates, assistants, and employees shall be
subject to chapter 76.

The board may require a bond in an amount that
it deems proper from any employee, which bond shall be duly conditioned for the
faithful performance of the duties of the employee, and the board may provide
that the premium on any bond be paid out of the revenues of the waterworks and
water systems under the jurisdiction of the board.

The manager at a time that may be prescribed by
the board, shall present to the board full annual reports of the principal
transactions of the water supply system during the last completed year; which
reports together with any recommendations that the board may think proper,
shall be presented to the chairperson and executive officer of the council of
the county and the council. [L 1949, c 86, §4; am L 1951, c 153, §1 and c 171,
§1(1); RL 1955, §146-103; HRS §54-54; gen ch 1985, 1993; am L 1998, c 124, §3;
am L 2000, c 253, §150]

Note

Chapter 77 referred to in text is repealed. See §76-13.5.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next